Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-1117.01
Special permit; issuance.

Permits for those systems determined through inspection by the district as not needing all of the safety equipment prescribed by the Nebraska Chemigation Act shall be forwarded immediately to the department for review. If the department determines that certain elements of the safety equipment otherwise prescribed by the act are not necessary, it shall so inform the district. The district shall then issue a special permit as approved by the department. Issuance of such special permits shall not relieve the permitholder or applicator from compliance with all other responsibilities under the act.

Laws 1988, LB 1046, § 2.